Alabama, session 2026rs, SB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER. As defined in Section
36-21-40, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) TASER. Any mechanism that is designed to emit or
project an electronic, magnetic, or other type of charge or
shock for the purpose of temporarily incapacitating an
individual.
(b) Notwithstanding Section 13A-3-27, Code of Alabama
1975, it shall be unlawful for a law enforcement officer to
use a taser on an individual who is restrained or otherwise
Page 1

use a taser on an individual who is restrained or otherwise
SB50 INTRODUCED
unable to resist, including when an individual has been placed
in handcuffs, body cuffs, or any other restraining device.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2